Washington statutes.
RCW 1.08.0392

Publication, sale, and distribution of code and supplements—Statute law committee publications account created—Purpose—Disbursements.

For the purposes of financing the production and sale of such of its publications as in the judgment of the statute law committee may be advantageously financed by the use of revolving fund moneys, there is hereby created, and the committee is authorized to maintain, a revolving fund to be known as statute law committee publications account. None of the provisions of RCW 43.01.050 shall be applicable to said fund nor to any moneys received or collected by the committee for publications financed by said fund.

All moneys shall be paid from said account by check or voucher in such form and in such manner as shall be prescribed by the committee.

[ 1961 c 246 s 2.]